fst/morphology/affixes/noun_prefixes.lexc
! Copyright © 2015–2026 Alberta Language Technology Lab (ALTLab)
! http://altlab.ualberta.ca/
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version.
!
! This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
! but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
! MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
! GNU Affero General Public License for more details.
!
! You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
! along with this program. If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

! noun_affixes.lexc
! ! ALL OF AEW NI CLASSES GO TO A SINGLE NI LEXICON
! ! ALL OF AEW NA CLASSES GO TO A SINGLE NA LEXICON
! ! ALL OF AEW DEPENDENT NA CLASSES GO TO A SINGLE NAD LEXICON (including kinship)
! ! ALL OF AEW DEPENDENT NI CLASSES GO TO A SINGLE NID LEXICON
! ! i2, i4 (animate dependent only), w3 (animate dependnet nouns only) should be the only special character we need for the noun affixes; -im possesion is done by flag diacritics in the affixes file

! Noun affixes

LEXICON NOUN_PREFIXES
@P.noun.Indep@     NOUN_INDEP_PREFIXES ;
@P.noun.DepKin@    NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_PREFIXES ;
@P.noun.DepNonKin@ NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON NOUN_INDEP_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit2%<  PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit2%<  PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.O@:@P.person.O@ot2%<     PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.NULL@                    PRENOUNS_GATE ;

LEXICON NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@ni4%<   PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@ki4%<   PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.O@:@P.person.O@w3%<      PRENOUNS_GATE ;

LEXICON NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@ni4%<   PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@ki4%<   PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.O@:@P.person.O@w3%<      PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.MI@0:@P.person.MI@0mi4%< PRENOUNS_GATE ;

LEXICON PRENOUNS_GATE
NOUNSTEMS_GATE ;
PRENOUNS ;
@R.noun.Indep@ NominalVerbDerivatives ;

LEXICON NominalVerbDerivatives
@P.class.II@ LexicalPreverbGate ;
@P.class.AI@ LexicalPreverbGate ;
@P.class.TI@ LexicalPreverbGate ;
@P.class.TA@ LexicalPreverbGate ;

!! Here we continue to lexical prenouns (in prenouns.lexc)
!
! LEXICON PRENOUNS
! PN/prenoun+:prenoun PRENOUNS_BOUND ;
! ...
! Here we return from prenouns

LEXICON PRENOUNS_BOUND
@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@%^EGLOT%< PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@-%<   PRENOUNS_GATE ;
! @D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@ NOUN_FRAG ;

@U.joiner.NULL@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.NULL@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@%^IC%^EGLOT%< PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@%^IC-%<   PRENOUNS_GATE ;
! @R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@@P.frag.FRAG@:@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@@P.frag.FRAG@%^IC NOUN_FRAG ;

LEXICON NOUNSTEMS_GATE
@R.noun.Indep@     NOUN_INDEP_STEMS ;
@R.noun.DepKin@    NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_STEMS ;
@R.noun.DepNonKin@ NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_STEMS ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Looping through the NOUN stems in the following LEXICONs
!
! LEXICON NOUN_INDEP_STEMS
! asikan NA ;
!
! LEXICON NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_STEMS
! nôhkom:ohkom NA ;
!
! LEXICON NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_STEMS
! mitâs:tâs NA ;
!
! End of place-holder noun stems
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
